Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. Upon the effective date of this act, there is hereby created
the Joint Interim Committee on the Elimination of Ad Valorem Taxes.
The Committee shall be composed of ten (10) members as follows:
1. Five members of the Senate designated by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate; and
2. Five members of the House of Representatives designated by
the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

Req. No. 1795 Page 1

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives shall each designate a co-chair from the
members of the Committee.
B. The meetings of the Committee shall be subject to the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act. The Committee shall convene upon the
joint call of the co-chairs.
C. The Committee shall conduct a comprehensive study of
alternative methods of taxation to replace local tax revenue lost
from the elimination of ad valorem tax. The study shall consider
potential revenue sources, economic impacts, and legal frameworks
for implementing property tax elimination.
D. For each alternative method of taxation considered, the
Committee shall:
1. Consider whether political subdivisions that currently
impose ad valorem taxes would have the authority to impose the
proposed alternative tax;
2. Determine the average tax rate for the proposed alternative
tax imposed by each type of political subdivision that would be
necessary to generate the same amount of tax revenue as the amount
of tax revenue lost as a result of the elimination of ad valorem
taxes;
3. Determine, if appropriate, the effect that broadening the
application of the proposed alternative tax at the local level would

Req. No. 1795 Page 2

have on the tax rates identified pursuant to paragraph 2 of this
subsection;
4. Identify whether tax revenue generated by the alternative
method of taxation would require redistribution to offset
disparities in available local tax revenue as a result of the
elimination of ad valorem taxes and, if so, evaluate the different
mechanisms of redistribution available; and
5. Identify and examine any other issue required to be
addressed to implement the elimination of ad valorem taxes.
E. Upon a request of the Committee, a state agency or political
subdivision of this state shall provide information for and
assistance in conducting the study under this section.
F. The members of the Committee shall receive no compensation
but shall receive travel reimbursement for necessary travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with the
State Travel Reimbursement Act. The Committee shall be staffed by
the Senate.
G. Not later than July 1, 2028, the Committee shall prepare and
electronically submit to the Legislature a written report containing
the results of the study and any recommendations for legislative or
other action. The report shall be published on the website of the
Senate.
H. The Committee created pursuant to this section shall be
abolished January 1, 2030.
Req. No. 1795 Page 3

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-1795 QD 3/6/2025 10:35:34 AM





















Req. No. 1795 Page 4